Illinois, session 104th, SB2482.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings. The General Assembly finds the 5following:6        (1) Four-year degrees in applied fields of study are 7    of increasing importance in enabling individuals to 8    qualify for and obtain jobs.9        (2) It is a priority in this State to promote 10    equitable access and afford the citizens in this State, 11    particularly underserved student populations and those in 12    rural areas of this State, greater access to higher 13    education.14        (3) Research has shown the following:15            (A) Most students attend college within 50 miles 16        of their home, and many Illinois residents live 17        outside of commuting distance to a public institution 18        of higher education.19            (B) In states where a community college 20        baccalaureate program has been implemented, typical 21        graduates are older, are working, or have family 22        responsibilities that preclude them from attending 23        traditional baccalaureate programs.24            (C) Community college baccalaureate graduates are   SB2482- 2 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1        often more racially diverse than counterparts in 2        similar programs of study.3        (4) Community colleges can help fill the gaps in this 4    State's higher education system by granting baccalaureate 5    degrees to meet the growing demand for a skilled workforce 6    by increasing access and reducing costs for students.7        (5) It is in this State's interest to enable community 8    colleges to seek authorization to offer baccalaureate 9    degrees.10        (6) Baccalaureate degree programs offered pursuant to 11    this Act do not otherwise alter the role and mission of a 12    public community college. Nothing in this Act is intended 13    to reduce the State's commitment to improving associate to 14    baccalaureate program transfer pathways for Illinois 15    students. 16    Section 5. The Public Community College Act is amended by 17adding Section 3-29.28 as follows: 18    (110 ILCS 805/3-29.28 new)19    Sec. 3-29.28. Baccalaureate degree program. 20    (a) A board of trustees may establish and offer a 21baccalaureate degree program and confer a bachelor's degree if 22all the following conditions are met: 23        (1) The board of trustees meets all of the 24    requirements as set forth in subsection (b) of this   SB2482- 3 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1    Section and has been approved by the State Board to offer a 2    bachelor's degree. 3        (2) After the program has been approved by the State 4    Board, the Board of Higher Education shall consider the 5    program for approval in a manner consistent with new 6    bachelor's degree programs at public and private 7    universities in this State. 8        (3) The board of trustees has identified and 9    documented, in writing, unmet workforce needs in the 10    region served by the community college in the subject area 11    of the baccalaureate degree program to be offered. The 12    board of trustees shall publish the documentation on the 13    community college district's website, make the 14    documentation publicly available, and shall present the 15    documentation to the State Board. 16        (4) The community college shall hold an applicable 17    accreditation for the baccalaureate degree program or have 18    applied for the accreditation. 19        (5) The board of trustees must demonstrate how the 20    baccalaureate degree program will demonstrate improved 21    racial and socioeconomic equity in student access, 22    enrollment, and completion by focusing outreach efforts on 23    and giving preference to those students to meet workforce 24    needs. 25        (6) Tuition per credit hour for the third and fourth 26    years of a 4-year baccalaureate program may not exceed   SB2482- 4 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1    150% of the tuition per credit hour of related 2    lower-division course tuition. 3    (b) The board of trustees shall demonstrate the district 4has the expertise, resources, and student interest to offer a 5baccalaureate degree. An application for approval from the 6State Board shall include, but is not limited to, all of the 7following: 8        (1) The board of trustees shall describe the labor 9    market need as specified in paragraph (3) of subsection 10    (a). 11        (2) The board of trustees must demonstrate that the 12    baccalaureate degree program will not unnecessarily 13    duplicate the degree programs offered by other 14    institutions of higher education in the community 15    college's district. 16        (3) The board of trustees shall describe the program's 17    purpose and its target population, related occupations, 18    and career paths. 19        (4) The board of trustees may demonstrate that the 20    baccalaureate degree program is built on existing 21    associate degree programs and that the baccalaureate 22    degree program prepares graduates for professional and 23    technical employment and opportunity to matriculate to 24    graduate degree programs, when applicable. 25        (5) The board of trustees shall demonstrate that the 26    community college has developed quality curricula that   SB2482- 5 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1    align with federal, State, and local requirements and will 2    prepare students with the appropriate level of skill to 3    meet students' educational goals. 4        (6) The board of trustees shall demonstrate student 5    demand for the baccalaureate program. 6        (7) The board of trustees shall verify the community 7    college has the fiscal resources in place or has budgeted 8    for financial support for the program in a cost-effective 9    manner. 10        (8) The board of trustees shall identify and document 11    the faculty available for teaching the program, including 12    the number of full-time faculty anticipated to teach in 13    the program, a description of the faculty's 14    qualifications, including the highest degree earned, 15    teaching experience, professional experience, and licenses 16    held by the faculty. The board of trustees must also 17    indicate how faculty are to be evaluated. 18    (c) A community college district is prohibited from using 19semester credit hours generated in a baccalaureate degree 20program for grants received pursuant to Section 2-16.02 of 21this Act. 22    (d) The board of trustees of a community college 23developing a baccalaureate degree program located in the same 24community college district as the main campus of any public 25institution of higher education shall notify that public 26institution of higher education at least 60 days before   SB2482- 6 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1submitting the application under subsection (b) to the State 2Board. Within 30 days after the date the board of trustees 3submits the notice, the public institution of higher education 4may provide a written response to the State Board for its 5review. A public institution of higher education may not 6prevent a community college from offering a baccalaureate 7degree program. 8    (e) A community college district that offers a 9baccalaureate degree program shall submit an annual report to 10the State Board, which shall include all of the following: 11        (1) The total number of students pursuing a bachelor's 12    degree at the community college district pursuant to this 13    Section. 14        (2) The total number of bachelor's degrees completed 15    at the community college district. 16        (3) Workforce data showing demand for the 17    baccalaureate degree programs offered at the community 18    college district. 19        (4) The average cost of tuition per credit hour for 20    the bachelor's degrees offered at the community college 21    district. 22    (f) The State Board shall conduct a statewide evaluation 23of all baccalaureate degree programs established under this 24Section. The results of the evaluation shall be reported, in 25writing, on or before 5 years after the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly to all of the   SB2482- 7 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1following: 2        (1) The Board of Higher Education. 3        (2) The Speaker of the House of Representatives. 4        (3) The Minority Leader of the House of 5    Representatives. 6        (4) The President of the Senate. 7        (5) The Minority Leader of the Senate. 8        (6) The Governor's Office of Management and Budget. 9    The evaluation shall include, but is not limited to, all 10of the following: 11        (A) All baccalaureate degree programs implemented. 12        (B) Information identifying applicants, admissions, 13    enrollments, demographic characteristics of students, and 14    degree recipients. 15        (C) The extent to which each baccalaureate degree 16    program established under this Section fulfills identified 17    workforce demands that require 4-year baccalaureate 18    degrees. 19        (D) Information on the pace of employment of students 20    and the subsequent job placement of graduates. 21        (E) The cost of each baccalaureate degree program and 22    the funding sources used to finance each program. 23        (F) For each baccalaureate degree program, the costs 24    to students, the amount of financial aid offered, and the 25    student debt levels of graduates. 26        (G) Time-to-degree rates and completion rates for each   SB2482- 8 -LRB104 12260 LNS 22372 b1    new baccalaureate degree program established under this 2    Section. 3        (H) The extent to which a baccalaureate degree program 4    established under this Section is in compliance with the 5    requirements of this Section. 6    A board of trustees shall submit the information necessary 7to conduct the evaluation required under this subsection (f), 8as determined by the evaluators, to the State Board.